test/src/gt-desc-yamls/badunass_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Unassimilated and badly assimilated words in CELSIUS_UNASS, KINO-UNASS, NOADE_BADASS and GAHPER_BADASS.

Tests:
  Noun - kompendium: # CELSIUS
    kompendium+N+Sg+Nom: [kompendium, kompendia, kompendij]
    kompendium+N+Sg+Acc: [kompendiumav, kompendiav, kompendijav]
    kompendium+N+Sg+Com: [kompendiumajn, kompendiumajna, kompendiajn, kompendiajna, kompendijijna, kompendijijn]
    kompendium+N+Ess: [kompendiuman, kompendian, kompendijin]
    
  Noun - aids: # CELSIUS
    aids+N+Sg+Nom: aids
    aids+N+Sg+Acc: aidsav
    aids+N+Sg+Com: [aidsajn, aidsajna]
    aids+N+Ess: aidsan
 
  Noun - maori: # KINO
    maori+N+Sg+Nom: maori
    maori+N+Sg+Acc: maoriv
    maori+N+Sg+Com: [maorijn, maorijna]
    maori+N+Ess: maorin
  
  Noun - farisea: # NOADE
    farisea+N+Sg+Nom: farisea
    farisea+N+Sg+Acc: fariseav
    farisea+N+Sg+Com: [fariseajn, fariseajna]
    farisea+N+Ess: farisean
  
  Noun - interviermme: # NOADE_BADASS, Err/Lex
    interviermme+N+Sg+Nom: interviermme
    interviermme+N+Sg+Ine: interviermmen
    interviermme+N+Sg+Ill: [interværmmáj, intervärmmáj]
    
  Noun - fábel: # GAHPER
    fábel+N+Sg+Nom: fábel
    fábel+N+Sg+Acc: fábelav
    fábel+N+Sg+Com: [fábelijn, fábelijna]
    fábel+N+Ess: fábelin
  
  Noun - boaksa: # BOAKSA_BADASS, MUORRA
    boaksa+N+Sg+Nom: boaksa
    boaksa+N+Sg+Acc: [båvsav, båksav]
    boaksa+N+Sg+Com: [båvsajn, båksajna, båksajn, båvsajna]
    boaksa+N+Ess: boaksan

  
